Georgia statutes. TITLE 11 Commercial Code
Subpart 1 Default and Enforcement of Security Interest
11-9-620.
Acceptance of collateral in full or partial satisfaction of obligation; compulsory disposition of collateral.

Conditions to acceptance in satisfaction.Except as otherwise provided in subsection (g) of this Code section, a secured party may accept collateral in full or partial satisfaction of the obligation it secures only if:

The debtor consents to the acceptance under subsection (c) of this Code section;

The secured party does not receive, within the time set forth in subsection (d) of this Code section, a notification of objection to the proposal authenticated by:

A person to which the secured party was required to send a proposal under Code Section 11-9-621; or

Any other person, other than the debtor, holding an interest in the collateral subordinate to the security interest that is the subject of the proposal;

If the collateral is consumer goods, the collateral is not in the possession of the debtor when the debtor consents to the acceptance; and

Subsection (e) of this Code section does not require the secured party to dispose of the collateral or the debtor waives the requirement pursuant to Code Section 11-9-624.

Purported acceptance ineffective.A purported or apparent acceptance of collateral under this Code section is ineffective unless:

The secured party consents to the acceptance in an authenticated record or sends a proposal to the debtor; and

The conditions of subsection (a) of this Code section are met.

Debtor’s consent.For purposes of this Code section:

A debtor consents to an acceptance of collateral in partial satisfaction of the obligation it secures only if the debtor agrees to the terms of the acceptance in a record authenticated after default; and

A debtor consents to an acceptance of collateral in full satisfaction of the obligation it secures only if the debtor agrees to the terms of the acceptance in a record authenticated after default or the secured party:

Sends to the debtor after default a proposal that is unconditional or subject only to a condition that collateral not in the possession of the secured party be preserved or maintained;

In the proposal, proposes to accept collateral in full satisfaction of the obligation it secures; and

Does not receive a notification of objection authenticated by the debtor within 20 days after the proposal is sent.

Effectiveness of notification.To be effective under paragraph (2) of subsection (a) of this Code section, a notification of objection must be received by the secured party:

In the case of a person to which the proposal was sent pursuant to Code Section 11-9-621, within 20 days after notification was sent to that person; and

In other cases:

Within 20 days after the last notification was sent pursuant to Code Section 11-9-621; or

If a notification was not sent, before the debtor consents to the acceptance under subsection (c) of this Code section.

Mandatory disposition of consumer goods.A secured party that has taken possession of collateral shall dispose of the collateral pursuant to Code Section 11-9-610 within the time specified in subsection (f) of this Code section if:

Sixty percent of the cash price has been paid in the case of a purchase money security interest in consumer goods; or

Sixty percent of the principal amount of the obligation secured has been paid in the case of a nonpurchase money security interest in consumer goods.

Compliance with mandatory disposition requirement.To comply with subsection (e) of this Code section, the secured party shall dispose of the collateral:

Within 90 days after taking possession; or

Within any longer period to which the debtor and all secondary obligors have agreed in an agreement to that effect entered into and authenticated after default.

No partial satisfaction in consumer transaction.In a consumer transaction, a secured party may not accept collateral in partial satisfaction of the obligation it secures.

History. —
Code 1981, §11-9-620, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 362, § 1.

11-9-621.
Notification of proposal to accept collateral.

Persons to which proposal to be sent.A secured party that desires to accept collateral in full or partial satisfaction of the obligation it secures shall send its proposal to:

Any person from which the secured party has received, before the debtor consented to the acceptance, an authenticated notification of a claim of an interest in the collateral;

Any other secured party or lienholder that, ten days before the debtor consented to the acceptance, held a security interest in or other lien on the collateral perfected by the filing of a financing statement that:

Identified the collateral;

Was indexed under the debtor’s name as of that date; and

Was filed in the office or offices in which to file a financing statement against the debtor covering the collateral as of that date; and

Any other secured party that, ten days before the debtor consented to the acceptance, held a security interest in the collateral perfected by compliance with a statute, regulation, or treaty described in subsection (a) of Code Section 11-9-311.

Proposal to be sent to secondary obligor in partial satisfaction.A secured party that desires to accept collateral in partial satisfaction of the obligation it secures shall send its proposal to any secondary obligor in addition to the persons described in subsection (a) of this Code section.

History. —
Code 1981, §11-9-621, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 362, § 1.

11-9-622.
Effect of acceptance of collateral.

Effect of acceptance.A secured party’s acceptance of collateral in full or partial satisfaction of the obligation it secures:

Discharges the obligation to the extent consented to by the debtor;

Transfers to the secured party all of a debtor’s rights in the collateral;

Discharges the security interest or agricultural lien that is the subject of the debtor’s consent and any subordinate security interest or other subordinate lien; and

Terminates any other subordinate interest.

Discharge of subordinate interest notwithstanding noncompliance.A subordinate interest is discharged or terminated under subsection (a) of this Code section, even if the secured party fails to comply with this article.

History. —
Code 1981, §11-9-622, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 362, § 1.

11-9-623.
Right to redeem collateral.

Persons that may redeem.A debtor, any secondary obligor, or any other secured party or lienholder may redeem collateral.

Requirements for redemption.To redeem collateral, a person shall tender:

Fulfillment of all obligations secured by the collateral; and

The reasonable expenses and attorney’s fees described in paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of Code Section 11-9-615.

When redemption may occur.A redemption may occur at any time before a secured party:

Has collected collateral under Code Section 11-9-607;

Has disposed of collateral or entered into a contract for its disposition under Code Section 11-9-610; or

Has accepted collateral in full or partial satisfaction of the obligation it secures under Code Section 11-9-622.

History. —
Code 1981, §11-9-623, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 362, § 1.

11-9-624.
Waiver.

Waiver of disposition notification.A debtor or secondary obligor may waive the right to notification of disposition of collateral under Code Section 11-9-611 only by an agreement to that effect entered into and authenticated after default.

Waiver of mandatory disposition.A debtor may waive the right to require disposition of collateral under subsection (e) of Code Section 11-9-620 only by an agreement to that effect entered into and authenticated after default.

Waiver of redemption right.Except in a consumer goods transaction, a debtor or secondary obligor may waive the right to redeem collateral under Code Section 11-9-623 only by an agreement to that effect entered into and authenticated after default.

History. —
Code 1981, §11-9-624, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 362, § 1.